Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2202
Warrants; registration; form of record.

The State Treasurer and the treasurer of every county, city, school district, learning community, or other municipal corporation shall keep a warrant register, which register shall show in columns arranged for that purpose the number, the date, and the amount of each warrant presented and registered, the particular fund upon which the same is drawn, the date of presentation, the name and address of the person in whose name the warrant is registered, the date of payment, the amount of interest, and the total amount paid thereon, with the date when notice to the person in whose name such warrant is registered is mailed.

Laws 1871, § 2, p. 114;

Laws 1895, c. 67, § 2, p. 240;

R.S.1913, § 6643;

C.S.1922, § 6174;

C.S.1929, § 77-2402;

R.S.1943, § 77-2202;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 13.